cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.aff
SFX v   ieć       ącymi     hcieć
SFX v   ieć       ące       hcieć
SFX v   ieć       ącego     hcieć
SFX v   ieć       ącemu     hcieć
SFX v   ieć       ącej      hcieć
SFX v   ieć       ąca       hcieć
SFX v   ieć       ącą       hcieć
SFX v   ieć       ący       dzieć
SFX v   ieć       ących     dzieć
SFX v   ieć       ącym      dzieć
SFX v   ieć       ącymi     dzieć
SFX v   ieć       ące       dzieć
SFX v   ieć       ącego     dzieć
SFX v   ieć       ącemu     dzieć
SFX v   ieć       ącej      dzieć
SFX v   ieć       ąca       dzieć
SFX v   ieć       ącą       dzieć
SFX v   ć         jący      leć
SFX v   ć         jących    leć
SFX v   ć         jącym     leć
SFX v   ć         jącymi    leć
SFX v   ć         jące      leć
SFX v   ć         jącego    leć
SFX v   ć         jącemu    leć
SFX v   ć         jącej     leć
SFX v   ć         jąca      leć
SFX v   ć         jącą      leć
SFX v   eć        ący       reć
SFX v   eć        ących     reć
SFX v   eć        ącym      reć
SFX v   eć        ącymi     reć
SFX v   eć        ące       reć
SFX v   eć        ącego     reć
SFX v   eć        ącemu     reć
SFX v   eć        ącej      reć
SFX v   eć        ąca       reć
SFX v   eć        ącą       reć
SFX v   eć        ący       zeć
SFX v   eć        ących     zeć
SFX v   eć        ącym      zeć
SFX v   eć        ącymi     zeć
SFX v   eć        ące       zeć
SFX v   eć        ącego     zeć
SFX v   eć        ącemu     zeć
SFX v   eć        ącej      zeć
SFX v   eć        ąca       zeć
SFX v   eć        ącą       zeć
SFX v   ć         cy        nąć
SFX v   ć         cych      nąć
SFX v   ć         cym       nąć
SFX v   ć         cymi      nąć
SFX v   ć         ce        nąć
SFX v   ć         cego      nąć
SFX v   ć         cemu      nąć
SFX v   ć         cej       nąć
SFX v   ć         ca        nąć
SFX v   ć         cą        nąć
SFX v   ść        dący      łaść
SFX v   ść        dących    łaść
SFX v   ść        dącym     łaść
SFX v   ść        dącymi    łaść
SFX v   ść        dące      łaść
SFX v   ść        dącego    łaść
SFX v   ść        dącemu    łaść
SFX v   ść        dącej     łaść
SFX v   ść        dąca      łaść
SFX v   ść        dącą      łaść
SFX v   ąść       ędący     ząść
SFX v   ąść       ędących   ząść
SFX v   ąść       ędącym    ząść
SFX v   ąść       ędącymi   ząść
SFX v   ąść       ędące     ząść
SFX v   ąść       ędącego   ząść
SFX v   ąść       ędącemu   ząść
SFX v   ąść       ędącej    ząść
SFX v   ąść       ędąca     ząść
SFX v   ąść       ędącą     ząść
SFX v   eść       odący     wieść
SFX v   eść       odących   wieść
SFX v   eść       odącym    wieść
SFX v   eść       odącymi   wieść
SFX v   eść       odące     wieść
SFX v   eść       odącego   wieść
SFX v   eść       odącemu   wieść
SFX v   eść       odącej    wieść
SFX v   eść       odąca     wieść
SFX v   eść       odącą     wieść
SFX v   c         gący      trz[ey]c
SFX v   c         gących    trz[ey]c
SFX v   c         gącym     trz[ey]c
SFX v   c         gącymi    trz[ey]c
SFX v   c         gące      trz[ey]c
SFX v   c         gącego    trz[ey]c
SFX v   c         gącemu    trz[ey]c
SFX v   c         gącej     trz[ey]c
SFX v   c         gąca      trz[ey]c
SFX v   c         gącą      trz[ey]c

SFX x Y 24
SFX x   0         a         [^gkly]i
SFX x   i         a         [gkl]i
SFX x   i         ja        yi
SFX x   y         a         y
SFX x   en        a         [^d]en
SFX x   en        na        den
SFX x   0         e         [^ly]i
SFX x   i         e         li
SFX x   i         je        yi
SFX x   y         e         y
SFX x   en        o         [^d]en
SFX x   en        no        den
SFX x   0         ej        [^ly]i
SFX x   i         ej        li
SFX x   i         jej       yi
SFX x   y         ej        y
SFX x   n         j         [^d]en
SFX x   en        nej       den
SFX x   0         ą         [^gkly]i
SFX x   i         ą         [gkl]i
SFX x   i         ją        yi
SFX x   y         ą         y
SFX x   en        ą         [^d]en
SFX x   en        ną        den

SFX K Y 14
SFX K   a         ą         a
SFX K   a         ej        [^gk]a
SFX K   a         iej       [gk]a
SFX K   a         e         [^gk]a
SFX K   a         ie        [gk]a
SFX K   a         ych       [^gik]a
SFX K   a         ich       [gk]a
SFX K   a         ch        ia
SFX K   a         ym        [^gik]a
SFX K   a         im        [gk]a
SFX K   a         m         ia
SFX K   a         ymi       [^gik]a
SFX K   a         imi       [gk]a
SFX K   a         mi        ia

SFX L Y 9
SFX L   a         u         [^cnw]a
SFX L   a         o         [cnw]a
SFX L   ś         siu       ś
SFX L   a         i         [^icnw]a
SFX L   a         0         ia
SFX L   ś         si        ś
SFX L   a         ę         [^cnw]a
SFX L   a         ą         [^cnw]a
SFX L   ś         sią       ś
