cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.dic
Agniesia/ALNm
Agunia/ALNm
Aguś/ALN
akwenowy/XYbx
Aldunia/ALNm
Alusia/ALNm
amnestionowana/K
Andzia/ALNm
Anianiny/XYx
Anielcia/ALNm
Antosia/ALNm
antyseksualny/XYbx
aptekarzowa/KL
aresztowana/K
asteniczny/XYbx
babcia/ALNm
babunia/ALNm
babusia/ALNm
bakałarzowa/KL
bałwochwalczy/Xbxy
bankierowa/KL
baronowa/KL
bazia/ALNm
beczunia/ALNm
besztać/EHIdikv
bezdomna/K
bezduszny/XYbxy
białofioletowy/XYbxy
bidusia/ALNm
biedna/K
bluszczykowy/XYbx
błyskać/HIdikv
Bogusia/ALNm
bojarowa/KL
bozia/ALNm
bratowa/KL
briologiczny/XYbx
brzęczeć/HJdikv
bufetowa/KL
bułana/K
burmistrzowa/KL
buziunia/ALNm
bylinowy/XYbx
cebulowa/K
cedzić/EHIdikv
cesarzowa/KL
Chlewicki/XYx
chłonąć/BEFIejv
chora/K
chuda/K
chwilunia/ALNm
ciamcialamcia/ALNTm
ciapać/BEHIejv
ciapcia/ALNTm
ciekawska/K
ciemnobrunatny/XYbx
ciociunia/ALNm
cipunia/ALNm
ciurkać/EHIdikv
córcia/ALNm
córkowa/KL
córusia/ALNm
czadyjski/XYbxyc
Czarna/Kp
czepialska/K
czerwienić/EHIdikv
czterechsetna/K
czterolokalowy/XYbx
Ćwierciakiewiczowa/K
damusia/ALNm
Dąbkowa/K
defloracyjny/XYbx
dereszowata/K
dębieć/BHIdiv
Diomedesowy/XYx
Dobrusia/ALNm
dogaszać/EHIdikv
dolatać/HIdikv
Domaczkowa/K
dopełzać/HIdikv
doruchowski/XYbxyc
dorzeźbiać/EHIdikv
dosieczna/K
dościełać/EHIdikv
dowcipnisia/ALNm
dożerać/EHIdikv
drużynowa/KL
duraczyć/EHIdikv
dwójkowy/XYbxy
dwunormalna/K
dychotomiczny/XYbxy
dyrektorowa/KL
dziekanowa/KL
dzielna/K
dziurawić/EHIdikv
dżezopodobny/XYbx
ekonomowa/KL
Ela/ALNnM
elektorowa/KL
endosymbiotyczny/XYbx
Estusia/ALNm
fantomowy/XYbx
Fela/ALNn
fluoropochodna/K
foremniejszy/XYbx
Franusia/ALNm
fuczeć/HJdikv
Gabrysia/ALNm
gadulska/K
ganoidalny/XYbx
garderobna/KL
Gienia/ALNm
gilgać/EHIdikv
gładkotrzonowy/XYbx
głodna/K
głuchoniema/K
Gniewkowa/K
gorączkująca/K
gorzknieć/BHIejv
Graliński/XYx
grochowa/K
grubcia/ALNm
grzybowa/K
gwałcić/EHIdikv
gzymsiasty/XYbx
Hala/ALNn
Hela/ALNn
hetmanowa/KL
hiphopolowy/XYbx
Hypernova/K
ikarowy/XYbx
inna/K
inwalidzki/XYbxyc
Ircia/ALNm
istnieć/BHIejv
izofoniczna/K
Jadzia/ALNm
Jantosia/ALNm
jasnowidząca/K
jastarniański/XYbxyc
jedwabisty/XYbxy
Jola/ALNn
Julcia/ALNm
Jurgielewiczowa/K
kadzić/EHIdikv
kalusowy/XYbx
kapitanowa/KL
karogniada/K
kartoflany/XYbx
Kasia/ALNm
kawunia/ALNm
kicia/ALNm
kidać/EHIdikv
kilkominutowy/XYbx
Kinia/ALNm
Klarcia/ALNm
kłomnicki/XYbxyc
Kmitowa/K
knocić/EHIdikv
kochaniutka/K
kompotowy/XYbx
konsulowa/KL
koperkowa/K
Korneliny/XYx
kotunia/ALNm
kować/EHIdikv
Kozłowa/K
kremowożółty/XYbxy
kropcia/ALNm
królewiczowa/KL
krzewić/EHIdikv
Krzysia/ALNm
krzywa/K
krzyżownicowaty/XYbx
księżna/KMNmn
Kuncewiczowa/K
Kundzia/ALNm
kurfirstowa/KL
kusztykać/HIdikv
kwintylionowy/XYbx
lalunia/ALNm
leśniczowa/KL
lewa/KMNn
leżąca/K
lęknąć/BFHIejv
liberalistyczny/XYbxy
lubski/XYbxyc
Lucia/ALNmp
Lusia/ALNm
łamana/K
łkać/HIdikv
Łuczycki/XYx
łysa/K
magazynierowa/KL
majorowa/KL
majstrowa/KL
maluśka/K
małoskalowy/XYbx
mamcia/ALNm
mamusia/ALNm
Marcelcia/ALNm
marszałkowa/KL
marszczyć/EHIdikv
Martunia/ALNm
Masia/ALNm
matusia/ALNm
Mayenowa/K
mchowy/XYbx
Merkelowa/K
mglić/BEHIdiv
Michalcowa/K
Miecia/ALNm
Mielewski/XYx
miluchna/K
miłosna/KMNm
mineralogiczny/XYbx
Mironowa/K
Mirusia/ALNm
misiunia/ALNm
mizernieć/BHIejv
młynarzowa/KL
Monisia/ALNm
monologiczny/XYbx
motorowa/K
mulić/EHIdikv
mysia/ALNm
nabywczy/Xbxy
naczelna/K
naczelnikowa/KL
nadbiegać/HIdikv
nadpsuwać/EHIdikv
nagniatać/EHIdikv
najdroższa/K
najdufniejszy/XYbx
najpotworniejszy/XYbx
najzgubniejszy/XYbx
namakać/HIdikv
napierniczać/EHIdikv
nasępiać/EHIdikv
naśliniać/EHIdikv
nawiedzona/K
nawykać/HIdikv
neobehawiorystyczny/XYbx
niania/ALNm
niearesztujący/XYx
niebriefowany/XYx
niecmokany/XYx
niedepigmentujący/XYx
niedoktoryzujący/XYx
niedośledzony/XYx
nieekranujący/XYx
niefroterujący/XYx
niehaszowany/XYx
niekalkujący/XYx
niekoncentrujący/XYx
niekwatermistrzujący/XYx
nieletnia/K
niematchowany/XYx
nienacedzający/XYx
nienaszklony/XYx
nieobecna/K
nieobszczypany/XYx
nieodpacykowany/XYx
nieokropiony/XYx
nieparsowany/XYx
niepijąca/K
niepodnajęty/XYx
nieponapychany/XYx
niepośpieszający/XYx
niepresuponujący/XYx
nieprzemusztrowany/XYx
nieprzygrywający/XYx
nieremasterowany/XYx
nierozpędzony/XYx
niesfalandyzowany/XYx
niesprototypowany/XYx
nietąpiący/XYx
nieukwaszający/XYx
nieutrwalony/XYx
niewiadoma/K
niewpuklający/XYx
niewygrabiający/XYx
niewypromieniowujący/XYx
niewzniecany/XYx
niezalicytowany/XYx
niezamężna/K
niezatoczony/XYx
niezinternalizowany/XYx
nilotyczny/XYbx
niusia/ALNm
normalnieć/BHIejv
nowa/K
obezprzytomniać/EHIdikv
obłaskawiać/EHIdikv
oboźna/K
obrzeżać/EHIdikv
obtulać/EHIdikv
ochrzęstna/K
ociemniać/EHIdikv
odchwaszczać/EHIdikv
oddziałowa/KL
odgradzać/EHIdikv
odkrzaczać/EHIdikv
odmykać/EHIdikv
odpływać/HIdikv
odrętwiały/XYbx
odróżniać/EHIdikv
odsypiać/EHIdikv
odważać/EHIdikv
odzywać/HIdikv
odźwierna/K
oklejać/EHIdikv
omijać/EHIdikv
opluwać/EHIdikv
ordynatowa/KL
osiekać/EHIdikv
osiemnastomiesięczny/XYbx
oszałamiać/EHIdikv
otrzewna/K
paczusia/ALNm
paratyfusowy/XYbx
parówkowa/K
parskać/HIdikv
Patrysia/ALNm
piąta/K
Pietraszkowa/K
pięciolitrowy/XYbx
pięknisia/ALNm
pipcia/ALNm
piwoszyć/HIdikv
podchodzić/EHIdikv
podchorąża/K
Podkowiński/XYx
podmawiać/EHIdikv
podręczna/K
podsyłać/EHIdikv
podusia/ALNm
pokręcać/EHIdikv
położna/K
popielicowy/XYbx
poruszać/EHIdikv
porządnicka/K
powieszona/K
powszechnieć/BHIejv
półelastyczny/XYbx
prababcia/ALNm
prawnusia/ALNm
prawowierna/K
Protowy/XYx
prowiantowa/K
pryncypałowa/KL
przecierać/EHIdikv
przekątna/K
przekłuwać/EHIdikv
przepierdalać/EHIdikv
przesuwalny/XYbx
prześlepiać/EHIdikv
przyciągać/EHIdikv
przymarzać/HIdikv
przyprostokątna/K
przyspawać/EHIdikv
psipsiać/HIdikv
pułkownikowa/KL
pyzunia/ALN
quasisprężysty/XYbx
radna/K
rejentowa/KL
rokietnikowy/XYbx
rozbrzmiewać/HIdikv
rozjuszać/EHIdikv
rozorywać/BEGHIJdikv
rozrzewniać/EHIdikv
rozwijająca/K
rozwłóczyć/EHIdikv
rybcia/ALNm
Rybkowski/XYx
rządząca/K
samopotępiać/HIdikv
samosia/ALNm
senatorowa/KL
sępi/Xbx
skarżyć/EHIdikv
skazana/K
sklepowa/KL
słowacystyczny/XYbx
służąca/KL
smrodzić/BHIdikv
Sonia/ALNm
sposobić/EHIdikv
starczowzroczna/K
staroobrzędowy/XYbx
stolnikowa/KL
stożkowa/K
stronić/HIdikv
sukienunia/ALMm
suwnicowa/K
sykofancki/XYbxyc
synowa/KL
szatnicza/K
szefowa/KL
szkodzić/HIdikv
szumiący/Xx
szynkowa/K
świadkowa/KL
świechtać/EHIdikv
tatula/ALNTo
teczkowy/XYbx
Tesia/ALNm
Tochlowa/K
Tosia/ALNm
trajkotać/BEGHIJdikv
trójkątowy/XYbx
trzecia/K
tysięczna/K
ubezpieczać/EHIdikv
uduchowiony/XYbx
udziesięciokrotniać/EHIdikv
układnisia/ALNm
ukochana/K
ulubiać/EHIdikv
unudzać/EHIdikv
uprzemysławiać/EHIdikv
usrywać/EHIdikv
utwarzać/EHIdikv
uzależniona/K
użynać/EHIdikv
Walercia/ALNm
wariatuńcia/ALNm
wczesnokredowy/XYbx
wiceprzewodnicząca/KL
wiceszefowa/KL
widzieć/EHehjkv
Wierzcholski/XYx
Wiktusia/ALNm
władzunia/ALNm
wnurzać/EHIdikv
woźna/K
wódzia/ALNm
współdziałać/HIdikv
współrzędna/K
współzawodniczy/Xbx
wwiercać/EHIdikv
wydrwiwać/EHIdikv
wygodnicka/K
wykolejać/EHIdikv
wykwintnisia/ALNm
wymrażać/EHIdikv
wypominać/EHIdikv
wystrajać/EHIdikv
wytrząchać/EHIdikv
wzierać/HIdikv
zachowaniowy/XYbx
zaczyniać/EHIdikv
zaginiona/K
zakażać/EHIdikv
zamożnieć/BHIejv
zaoczna/K
zapowiadać/EHIdikv
zasychać/HIdikv
zatrzymana/K
zawlekać/EHIdikv
Zdziechowski/XYx
Zdzisia/ALNm
zestrzelać/EHIdikv
Ziejowa/K
złączać/EHIdikv
zrządzać/EHIdikv
zwiedzająca/K
zwrotniczowa/KL
źrenicowy/XYbx
Żabusia/L
żenić/EHIdikv
żoncia/ALNm
